createYaml/yaml_output/VII_IND_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx: bangisin
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx: bangisinoon
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv: bangisinini
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv: bangisininiwan
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx: bangisinzinoon
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx: bangisinzinoon
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv: bangisinzinini
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv: bangisinzininiwan
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgProx: bangisinooban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlProx: [bangisinoobaniin,bangisinoobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0SgObv: bangisininiiban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+0PlObv: [bangisininiibaniin,bangisininiibanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgProx: bangisinzinooban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlProx: [bangisinzinoobaniin ,bangisinzinoobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0SgObv: bangisinzininiiban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+0PlObv: [bangisinzininiibaniin,bangisinzininiibanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgProx: bangisinodog
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlProx: bangisinodogenan
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0SgObv: bangisininiwidog
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Dub+0PlObv: bangisininiwidogenan
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgProx: bangisinzinodog
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlProx: bangisinzinodogenan
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0SgObv: bangisinzininiwidog
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Dub+0PlObv: bangisinzininiwidogenan
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgProx: bangisinogoban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0PlProx: [bangisinogobaniin,bangisinogobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgObv: bangisininigoban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+0PlObv: [bangisininigobaniin,bangisininigobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgProx: bangisinzinoogoban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0PlProx: [bangisinzinoogobaniin,bangisinzinoogobanen]
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgObv: bangisinzininigoban
     bangisin+VII+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+0PlObv: [bangisinzininigobaniin,bangisinzininigobanen]
